Washington statutes.
RCW 35.54.095

Transfer of assets to general fund—When authorized—Payment of claims as general obligation, when.

(1) Any city or town maintaining a local improvement guaranty fund under this chapter, upon certification by the city or town treasurer that the local improvement guaranty fund has sufficient funds currently on hand to meet all valid outstanding obligations of the fund and all other obligations of the fund reasonably expected to be incurred in the near future, may by ordinance transfer assets from such fund to its general fund. The net cash of the local improvement guaranty fund may be reduced by such transfer to an amount not less than ten percent of the net outstanding obligations guaranteed by such fund.

(2) If, at any time within five years of any transfer of assets from the local improvement guaranty fund to the general fund of a city or town, the net cash of the local improvement guaranty fund is reduced below the minimum amount specified in subsection (1) of this section, the city or town shall, to the extent of the amount transferred, pay valid claims against the local improvement guaranty fund as a general obligation of the city or town. In addition, such city or town shall pay all reasonable costs of collection necessarily incurred by the holders of valid claims against the local improvement guaranty fund.

[ 1979 c 55 s 1.]